Tennessee, session 114, HB0573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-417(j)(12), is amended by
deleting "One hundred fifty (150) grams" and substituting "Fifty (50) grams".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0573
000399
- 1 -